Nebraska, session 109, LB135.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB135 LB135
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 10-702, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
10-702 (1) The question of issuing school district bonds shall may
be submitted at a special election or such question may be voted on at an
election held in compliance with subsection (3) of section 32-559
conjunction with the statewide primary or statewide general election. No
bonds shall be issued until the question has been submitted to the
qualified electors of the district and a majority of all the qualified
electors voting on the question have voted in favor of issuing the same ,
at an election called for the purpose, upon notice given by the school
board officers of the district as provided in subsection (3) of this
section at least twenty days prior to such election. If the election for
issuing bonds is held as a special election, the procedures provided in
section 10-703.01 shall be followed. The question of bond issues in such
districts, when defeated, shall not, except in case of fire or other
disaster or in the case of a newly created district, be resubmitted in
substance for a period of six months from and after the date of such
election.
(2) When the question of issuing bonds is to be submitted at a
statewide primary or statewide general election as ordered by a
resolution of a majority of the members of the school board of education,
such order shall be made in writing and filed with the election
commissioner or county clerk as required in subsection (3) of section
32-559 or election commissioner by March 1 for the statewide primary
election or September 1 for the statewide general election. The order
calling for the school bond election shall be filed with the county clerk
or election commissioner in the county having the greatest number of
electors entitled to vote on the question who . The county clerk or
election commissioner receiving such order shall conduct the school bond
election for the school district as provided in subsection (3) of section
32-559 the Election Act.
-2-

LB135 LB135
2025 2025
(3) A special notice of the election shall be published by the
school board of education in a newspaper or newspapers of general
circulation within the district stating the day of the election, the
hours during which the polls will be open, and any other information
deemed necessary in informing the public of the bond issue. The notice
shall be made at least twenty days prior to the election.
If the question of submitting bonds for the school district is voted
upon in one or more counties and the ballots have been certified across
county lines, the election boards in the counties where the ballots are
cast shall count the ballots on election day the same as all other
ballots are counted and seal the same in their ballots-cast container
along with other ballots.
The canvassing boards in each county shall canvass the returns in
the same manner as other returns are canvassed.
The county clerk or election commissioner in any adjoining county
voting on the bond issue shall certify the returns to the county clerk or
election commissioner of the county having the greatest number of
electors entitled to vote on the question of issuing bonds.
The county clerk or election commissioner in such county shall enter
the total returns from any adjoining county or counties to the total
votes recorded in his or her official book of votes cast and shall
certify the returns to the board of education for which such bond
election was held.
Sec. 2. Section 13-519, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
13-519 (1)(a) Subject to subdivisions (1)(b) and (c) of this
section, for all fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 1998, no
governmental unit shall adopt a budget containing a total of budgeted
restricted funds more than the last prior year's total of budgeted
restricted funds plus allowable growth plus the basic allowable growth
percentage of the base limitation established under section 77-3446. For
-3-

LB135 LB135
2025 2025
the second fiscal year in which a county will receive a full year of
receipts from the tax imposed in sections 77-27,223 to 77-27,227, the
prior year's total of restricted funds shall be the prior year's total of
restricted funds plus the total receipts from the tax imposed in sections
77-27,223 to 77-27,227 in the prior year. If a governmental unit
transfers the financial responsibility of providing a service financed in
whole or in part with restricted funds to another governmental unit or
the state, the amount of restricted funds associated with providing the
service shall be subtracted from the last prior year's total of budgeted
restricted funds for the previous provider and may be added to the last
prior year's total of restricted funds for the new provider. For
governmental units that have consolidated, the calculations made under
this section for consolidating units shall be made based on the combined
total of restricted funds, population, or full-time equivalent students
of each governmental unit.
(b) Educational For all fiscal years beginning on or after July 1,
2008, educational service units may exceed the limitations of subdivision
(1)(a) of this section to the extent that one hundred ten percent of the
needs for the educational service unit calculated pursuant to section
79-1241.03 exceeds the budgeted restricted funds allowed pursuant to
subdivision (1)(a) of this section.
(c) For fiscal year 2017-18, the last prior year’s total of
restricted funds for counties shall be the last prior year’s total of
restricted funds less the last prior year’s restricted funds budgeted by
counties under sections 39-2501 to 39-2520, plus the last prior year’s
amount of restricted funds budgeted by counties under sections 39-2501 to
39-2520 to be used for capital improvements.
(d) The limitations of subdivision (1)(a) of this section shall not
apply to the budget or budget statement adopted by a regional
metropolitan transit authority for the first five fiscal years commencing
on the January 1 that follows the effective date of the conversion of the
-4-

LB135 LB135
2025 2025
transit authority established under the Transit Authority Law into a
regional metropolitan transit authority.
(2) A governmental unit may exceed the limit provided in subdivision
(1)(a) of this section for a fiscal year by up to an additional one
percent upon the affirmative vote of at least seventy-five percent of the
governing body.
(3)(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b) of this
subsection, a (3) A governmental unit may exceed the applicable allowable
growth percentage otherwise prescribed in this section by an amount
approved by a majority of legal voters voting on the issue at a special
election called for such purpose upon the recommendation of the governing
body or upon the receipt by the county clerk or election commissioner of
a petition requesting an election signed by at least five percent of the
legal voters of the governmental unit. The recommendation of the
governing body or the petition of the legal voters shall include the
amount and percentage by which the governing body would increase its
budgeted restricted funds for the ensuing year over and above the current
year's budgeted restricted funds. Except as otherwise provided in
subdivision (b) of this subsection, the The county clerk or election
commissioner shall call for a special election on the issue within thirty
days after the receipt of such governing body recommendation or legal
voter petition. Such The election shall be held pursuant to the Election
Act, and all costs shall be paid by the governing body. The issue may be
approved on the same question as a vote to exceed the levy limits
provided in section 77-3444.
(b) For a school district, the election shall be held in compliance
with subsection (3) of section 32-559.
(4) In lieu of the election procedures in subsection (3) of this
section, any governmental unit may, for a period of one year, exceed the
allowable growth percentage otherwise prescribed in this section by an
amount approved by a majority of legal voters voting at a meeting of the
-5-

LB135 LB135
2025 2025
residents of the governmental unit, called after notice is published in a
newspaper of general circulation in the governmental unit at least twenty
days prior to the meeting. At least ten percent of the registered voters
residing in the governmental unit shall constitute a quorum for purposes
of taking action to exceed the allowable growth percentage. If a majority
of the registered voters present at the meeting vote in favor of
exceeding the allowable growth percentage, a copy of the record of that
action shall be forwarded to the Auditor of Public Accounts along with
the budget documents. The issue to exceed the allowable growth percentage
may be approved at the same meeting as a vote to exceed the limits or
final levy allocation provided in section 77-3444.
Sec. 3. Section 13-809, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
13-809 (1) Subject to subsections (2) and (3) of this section, any
joint entity may from time to time issue its bonds in such principal
amounts as its governing body shall deem necessary to provide sufficient
funds to carry out any of the joint entity's purposes and powers,
including the establishment or increase of reserves, the payment of
interest accrued during construction of a project and for such period
thereafter as the governing body may determine, and the payment of all
other costs or expenses of the joint entity incident to and necessary or
convenient to carry out its purposes and powers.
(2) Bonds issued on or after April 18, 2018, for purposes of the
Public Facilities Construction and Finance Act shall be subject to a vote
prior to issuance as provided in such act.
(3) (3)(a) For any joint entity created on or after February 14,
2024, that includes a Nebraska school district or an educational service
unit, such joint entity shall not issue any bonds until (a) the question
of issuing such bonds has been submitted to the qualified electors of
each Nebraska school district or educational service unit that is part of
the joint entity at an election held in compliance with subsection (3) of
-6-

LB135 LB135
2025 2025
section 32-559 called for that purpose as provided in this section and
(b) , within each such school district or educational service unit, a
majority of the qualified electors voting on the question voted in favor
of issuing the bonds.
(b) The joint entity shall give notice of the election at least
fifty days prior to the election as required in subsection (3) of section
32-559. The question of issuing bonds may be submitted at the statewide
primary or general election. The election shall be conducted in
accordance with the Election Act.
(c) The question of bond issues, when defeated, shall not be
resubmitted in substance for a period of at least six months after the
date of such election.
Sec. 4. Section 13-2507, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
13-2507 (1) Subject to subsection (4) of this section, a joint
public agency shall have only those powers of taxation as one or more of
the participating public agencies has and only as specifically provided
in the agreement proposing creation of the joint public agency, except
that a joint public agency shall not levy a local option sales tax.
Participating public agencies may agree to allow the joint public agency
to levy a property tax rate not to exceed a limit as provided in the
agreement if the agreement also limits the levy authority of the
overlapping participating public agencies collectively to the same
amount. The levy authority of a joint public agency shall be allocated by
the city or county as provided in section 77-3443, and the agreement may
require allocation of levy authority by the city or county.
(2) If one or more of the participating public agencies is a
municipality, the agreement may allow any occupation or wheel tax to be
extended over the area encompassed by the joint public agency at a rate
uniform to that of the city or village for the purpose of providing
revenue to finance the services to be provided by the joint public
-7-

LB135 LB135
2025 2025
agency. The tax shall not be extended until the procedures governing
enactment by the municipality are followed by the joint public agency,
including any requirement for a public vote.
(3) If the agreement calls for the allocation of property tax levy
authority to the joint public agency, the amount of the allocation to the
joint public agency and from each participating public agency shall be
reported to the Property Tax Administrator.
(4)(a) Prior to the issuance of bonds and the pledge of property tax
levy authority allocated to a joint public agency to pay the principal of
and interest on bonds to be issued by the joint public agency, the joint
public agency shall hold an election to present the question of issuing
such bonds and levying such tax to the registered voters of the
participating public agency which allocated such property tax levy
authority. Such election shall be held at a special election called for
such purpose or an election held in conjunction with a statewide or local
primary or general election, except that if one or more of the
participating public agencies is a school district, the election shall be
held in compliance with subsection (3) of section 32-559.
(b) If a ballot question is required to be submitted to the
registered voters of more than one participating public agency pursuant
to subdivision (a) of this subsection and if the participating public
agencies have overlapping jurisdiction of any geographic area, the
registered voters residing in the geographic area subject to overlapping
jurisdiction shall only be entitled to one vote on the ballot question.
(c) A joint public agency may issue refunding bonds as authorized in
section 13-2537 which are payable from the same security and tax levy
authority as bonds being refunded without holding an election as required
by this subsection if the issuance of the refunding bonds does not allow
additional principal and does not allow extension of the final maturity
date of the indebtedness.
Sec. 5. Section 32-405, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
-8-

LB135 LB135
2025 2025
2024, is amended to read:
32-405 Any special election under the Election Act shall be held on
the first Tuesday following the second Monday of the selected month
unless otherwise specifically provided. Except as otherwise specifically
provided, no special election shall be held under the Election Act in
April, May, June, October, November, or December of an even-numbered year
unless it is held in conjunction with the statewide primary or general
election. No special election shall be held under the Election Act in
September of an even-numbered year except as provided in section 32-564
and except for a special election by a political subdivision pursuant to
section 13-519 or 77-3444 to approve a property tax levy or exceed a
property tax levy limitation. A special election for a Class I, II, III,
IV, or V school district which is located in whole or in part in a county
in which a city of the primary or metropolitan class is located may be
held in conjunction with the primary or general election for a city of
the primary or metropolitan class which is governed by a home rule
charter.
Sec. 6. Section 32-559, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
32-559 (1)(a) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section
77-3444, any issue to be submitted to the registered voters at a special
election by a political subdivision shall be certified by the clerk of
the political subdivision to the election commissioner or county clerk on
or before the eighth Friday prior to the election. A special election
under this subsection may be held by mail as provided in sections 32-952
to 32-959. Any other special election under this subsection section shall
be subject to section 32-405.
(b) In lieu of submitting an the issue at a special election
pursuant to subdivision (1)(a) of this section, the any political
subdivision may submit the issue at a statewide primary or general
election or at any scheduled county election, except that no such issue
-9-

LB135 LB135
2025 2025
shall be submitted at a statewide election or scheduled county election
unless the issue to be submitted has been certified by the clerk of the
political subdivision to the election commissioner or county clerk by
March 1 for the primary election and by September 1 for the general
election. After the election commissioner or county clerk has received
the certification of the issue to be submitted, the election commissioner
or county clerk he or she shall be responsible for all matters relating
to the submission of the issue to the registered voters, except that the
clerk of the political subdivision shall be responsible for the
publication or posting of any required special notice of the submission
of such issue other than the notice required to be given of the statewide
election issues. The election commissioner or county clerk shall prepare
the ballots and issue ballots for early voting and shall also conduct the
submission of the issue, including the receiving and counting of the
ballots on the issue. The election returns shall be made to the election
commissioner or county clerk. The ballots shall be counted and canvassed
at the same time and in the same manner as the other ballots. Upon
completion of the canvass of the vote by the county canvassing board, the
election commissioner or county clerk shall certify the election results
to the governing body of the political subdivision. The canvass by the
county canvassing board shall have the same force and effect as if made
by the governing body of the political subdivision.
(2)(a) A political subdivision that has submitted an issue for a
special election under subdivision (1)(a) or (3)(c) of this section may
cancel the special election if the Secretary of State, election
commissioner, or county clerk receives a resolution adopted by the
political subdivision canceling the special election on or before the
fourth Thursday prior to the election. No cancellation shall be effective
after such date. If a special election is canceled in such manner, the
political subdivision shall be responsible for the costs incurred that
are related to the canceled election. Such costs shall include all
-10-

LB135 LB135
2025 2025
chargeable costs as provided in section 32-1202 associated with preparing
for and conducting a special election.
(b) A political subdivision that has submitted an issue at a
statewide primary or general election or at any scheduled county election
under subdivision (1)(b) or subsection (3) of this section may withdraw
the issue from the ballot if the Secretary of State, election
commissioner, or county clerk receives a resolution adopted by the
political subdivision withdrawing the issue from the ballot no later than
March 1 prior to a statewide primary election or September 1 prior to a
statewide general election. No withdrawal shall be effective after such
date. Any issue withdrawn in this manner shall not be printed on the
ballot.
(3)(a) A school district election called to approve the issuance of
bonds, approve a property tax levy or levy increase, or approve exceeding
a property tax levy limitation by a school district shall comply with
subdivision (b) or (c) of this subsection. The question shall not be
submitted at an election under this subsection within ten months after
being defeated at any election. Except as otherwise specifically provided
by law, the registered voters of the school district shall be entitled to
vote on the question presented at the election and the question shall be
approved if a majority of the votes cast upon the question are in favor
thereof.
(b)(i) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c) of this
subsection, the election shall be held in conjunction with the statewide
primary or general election or in an odd-numbered year in conjunction
with a regularly scheduled general election of a political subdivision.
The school board shall file the order or certify the question for the
issue to be on the ballot by March 1 for the statewide primary election,
September 1 for the statewide general election, and the eighth Friday
prior to the general election of a political subdivision.
(ii) If the question is voted upon in one or more counties and the
-11-

LB135 LB135
2025 2025
ballots have been certified across county lines, the election boards in
the counties where the ballots are cast shall count the ballots on
election day in the same manner as all other ballots are counted and seal
the same in their ballots-cast container along with other ballots. The
canvassing boards in each county shall canvass the returns in the same
manner as other returns are canvassed. The election commissioner or
county clerk in any adjoining county voting on the question shall certify
the returns to the election commissioner or county clerk of the county
having the greatest number of electors entitled to vote on the question.
The election commissioner or county clerk in such county shall enter the
total returns from any adjoining county or counties to the total votes
recorded in the official book of votes cast and shall certify the returns
to the school board of the school district for which such bond election
was held.
(c)(i) The question may also be submitted at a special election
subject to section 32-405 if the purpose of the bonds, of the tax levy or
levy increase, or of exceeding the tax levy limitation is to address an
emergency due to circumstances beyond the control of the school board of
the school district, such as the destruction of a facility or other
infrastructure by fire, flood, tornado, or other emergency circumstance.
(ii) The election commissioner or county clerk or, if the school
district lies in more than one county, the election commissioner or
county clerk in the county having the greatest number of electors
entitled to vote on the question shall designate the polling places and
appoint the election officials, who need not be the regular election
officials, and otherwise conduct the election as provided under the
Election Act except as otherwise specifically provided in this
subsection. The school board of the school district shall (A) designate
the form of ballot, (B) reimburse the election commissioner or county
clerk for the expenses of conducting the election as provided in sections
32-1201 to 32-1208 and at the minimum rate as described in subdivision
-12-

LB135 LB135
2025 2025
(2)(d) of section 32-1203, (C) give notice of the election by first-class
mail at least thirty days prior to the election, and (D) cause the sample
ballot to be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the
school district one time not more than fifteen days nor less than seven
days prior to the election. No notice of the election shall be required
to be given by the election commissioner or county clerk. The notice of
election shall state where ballots for early voting may be obtained.
(iii) The ballots shall be counted by the election commissioner or
county clerk conducting the election and two disinterested persons
appointed by the election commissioner or county clerk. When the polls
are closed, the receiving board shall deliver the ballots to the election
commissioner or county clerk conducting the election who, with the two
disinterested persons appointed by the election commissioner or county
clerk, shall proceed to count the ballots.
(iv) Ballots for early voting shall be furnished to the election
commissioner or county clerk and ready for distribution by the election
commissioner or county clerk conducting the election not less than
twenty-one days prior to the election.
(v) When the school district lies in more than one county, the
election commissioner or county clerk in any other county containing part
of such school district shall, upon request, certify its registration
books for those precincts in which the school district is located to the
election commissioner or county clerk conducting the election and shall
immediately forward all requests for ballots for early voting to the
election commissioner or county clerk charged with issuing such ballots
or otherwise arrange for distribution of ballots for early voting. Not
less than five days prior to the election, the school board of the school
district shall certify to the election commissioner or county clerk
conducting the election a list of all registered voters of the school
district in any other county or counties qualified to vote on the
question.
-13-

LB135 LB135
2025 2025
(vi) All ballots cast at the election shall be counted by the same
board. When all the ballots have been counted, the returns of such
election shall be turned over to the school board of the school district
in which the election was held for the purpose of making a canvass
thereof. The two disinterested persons appointed on the counting board
shall receive wages at no less than the minimum rate set in section
48-1203 for each hour of service rendered.
Sec. 7. Section 32-1203, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
32-1203 (1) Each city, village, township, school district, public
power district, sanitary and improvement district, metropolitan utilities
district, fire protection district, natural resources district, regional
metropolitan transit authority, community college area, learning
community coordinating council, educational service unit, hospital
district, reclamation district, library board, and airport authority
shall pay for the costs of nominating and electing its officers as
provided in subsection (2), (3), or (4) of this section. If a special
issue is placed on the ballot at the time of the statewide primary or
general election by any political subdivision, the political subdivision
shall pay for the costs of the election as provided in subsection (2),
(3), or (4) of this section.
(2) The charge for each primary and general election shall be
determined by (a) ascertaining the total cost of all chargeable costs as
described in section 32-1202, (b) dividing the total cost by the number
of precincts participating in the election to fix the cost per precinct,
(c) prorating the cost per precinct by the inked ballot inch in each
precinct for each political subdivision, and (d) totaling the cost for
each precinct for each political subdivision, except that the minimum
charge for each primary and general election for each political
subdivision shall be one hundred dollars.
(3) In lieu of the charge determined pursuant to subsection (2) of
-14-

LB135 LB135
2025 2025
this section, the election commissioner or county clerk may charge public
power districts the fee for election costs set by section 70-610.
(4) In lieu of the charge determined pursuant to subsection (2) of
this section, the election commissioner or county clerk may bill school
districts directly for the costs of a special an election held under
section 32-559 10-703.01.
Sec. 8. Section 77-3444, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-3444 (1) A political subdivision may exceed the limits provided
in section 77-3442 or a final levy allocation determination as provided
in section 77-3443 by an amount not to exceed a maximum levy approved by
a majority of registered voters voting on the issue. The issue shall be
placed before the voters at in a primary, general, or special election,
except that if the political subdivision is a school district, the
election shall be held in compliance with subsection (3) of section
32-559 at which the issue is placed before the registered voters. A vote
to exceed the limits provided in section 77-3442 or a final levy
allocation as provided in section 77-3443 must be approved prior to
October 10 of the fiscal year which is to be the first to exceed the
limits or final levy allocation. The governing body of the political
subdivision may call for the submission of the issue to the voters (a) by
passing a resolution calling for exceeding the limits or final levy
allocation by a vote of at least two-thirds of the members of the
governing body and delivering a copy of the resolution to the county
clerk or election commissioner of every county which contains all or part
of the political subdivision or (b) upon receipt of a petition by the
county clerk or election commissioner of every county containing all or
part of the political subdivision requesting an election signed by at
least five percent of the registered voters residing in the political
subdivision. The resolution or petition shall include the amount of levy
which would be imposed in excess of the limits provided in section
-15-

LB135 LB135
2025 2025
77-3442 or the final levy allocation as provided in section 77-3443 and
the duration of the excess levy authority. The excess levy authority
shall not have a duration greater than five years. Except as otherwise
provided in section 32-559, any Any resolution or petition calling for a
special election shall be filed with the county clerk or election
commissioner on or before the fifth Friday prior to the election, and the
time of publication and providing a copy of the notice of election
required in section 32-802 shall be no later than twenty days prior to
the election, and the . The county clerk or election commissioner shall
place the issue on the ballot at an election as called for in the
resolution or petition which is at least thirty-one days after receipt of
the resolution or petition. The election shall be held pursuant to the
Election Act. The For petitions filed with the county clerk or election
commissioner on or after May 1, 1998, the petition shall be in the form
as provided in sections 32-628 to 32-631. Any excess levy authority
approved under this section shall terminate pursuant to its terms, on a
vote of the governing body of the political subdivision to terminate the
authority to levy more than the limits, at the end of the fourth fiscal
year following the first year in which the levy exceeded the limit or the
final levy allocation, or as provided in subsection (4) of this section,
whichever is earliest. A governing body may pass no more than one
resolution calling for an election pursuant to this section during any
one calendar year. Only one election may be held in any one calendar year
pursuant to a petition initiated under this section.
(2) The ballot question may include any terms and conditions set
forth in the resolution or petition and shall include the following:
"Shall (name of political subdivision) be allowed to levy a property tax
not to exceed ............ cents per one hundred dollars of taxable
valuation in excess of the limits prescribed by law until fiscal
year ............ for the purposes of (general operations; building
construction, remodeling, or site acquisition; or both general operations
-16-

LB135 LB135
2025 2025
and building construction, remodeling, or site acquisition)?". If a
majority of the votes cast upon the ballot question are in favor of such
tax, the county board shall authorize a tax in excess of the limits in
section 77-3442 or the final levy allocation in section 77-3443 but such
tax shall not exceed the amount stated in the ballot question. If a
majority of those voting on the ballot question are opposed to such tax,
the governing body of the political subdivision shall not impose such
tax.
(3) In lieu of the election procedures in subsection (1) of this
section, any political subdivision subject to section 77-3443 and
villages may approve a levy in excess of the limits in section 77-3442 or
the final levy allocation provided in section 77-3443 for a period of one
year at a meeting of the residents of the political subdivision or
village, called after notice is published in a newspaper of general
circulation in the political subdivision or village at least twenty days
prior to the meeting. At least ten percent of the registered voters
residing in the political subdivision or village shall constitute a
quorum for purposes of taking action to exceed the limits or final levy
allocation. A record shall be made of the registered voters residing in
the political subdivision or village who are present at the meeting. The
method of voting at the meeting shall protect the secrecy of the ballot.
If a majority of the registered voters present at the meeting vote in
favor of exceeding the limits or final levy allocation, a copy of the
record of that action shall be forwarded to the county board prior to
October 10 and the county board shall authorize a levy as approved by the
residents for the year. If a majority of the registered voters present at
the meeting vote against exceeding the limits or final allocation, the
limit or allocation shall not be exceeded and the political subdivision
shall have no power to call for an election under subsection (1) of this
section.
(4) A political subdivision may rescind or modify a previously
-17-

LB135 LB135
2025 2025
approved excess levy authority prior to its expiration by a majority of
registered voters voting on the issue in a primary, general, or special
election at which the issue is placed before the registered voters,
except that if the political subdivision is a school district, the
election shall be held in compliance with subsection (3) of section
32-559. A vote to rescind or modify must be approved prior to October 10
of the fiscal year for which it is to be effective. The governing body of
the political subdivision may call for the submission of the issue to the
voters (a) by passing a resolution calling for the rescission or
modification by a vote of at least two-thirds of the members of the
governing body and delivering a copy of the resolution to the county
clerk or election commissioner of every county which contains all or part
of the political subdivision or (b) upon receipt of a petition by the
county clerk or election commissioner of every county containing all or
part of the political subdivision requesting an election signed by at
least five percent of the registered voters residing in the political
subdivision. The resolution or petition shall include the amount and the
duration of the previously approved excess levy authority and a statement
that either such excess levy authority will be rescinded or such excess
levy authority will be modified. If the excess levy authority will be
modified, the amount and duration of such modification shall be stated.
The modification shall not have a duration greater than five years. The
county clerk or election commissioner shall place the issue on the ballot
at an election as called for in the resolution or petition which is at
least thirty-one days after receipt of the resolution or petition, and
the time of publication and providing a copy of the notice of election
required in section 32-802 shall be no later than twenty days prior to
the election. The election shall be held pursuant to the Election Act.
(5) For purposes of this section, when the political subdivision is
a sanitary and improvement district, registered voter means a person
qualified to vote as provided in section 31-735. Any election conducted
-18-

LB135 LB135
2025 2025
under this section for a sanitary and improvement district shall be
conducted and counted as provided in sections 31-735 to 31-735.06.
(6) For purposes of this section, when the political subdivision is
a school district or a multiple-district school system, registered voter
includes persons qualified to vote for the members of the school board of
the school district which is voting to exceed the maximum levy limits
pursuant to this section.
Sec. 9. Section 79-1029, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1029 A school district may exceed the budget authority for the
general fund budget of expenditures prescribed in section 79-1023 by an
amount approved by a majority of legal voters voting on the issue at an
election held in compliance with subsection (3) of section 32-559 a
primary, general, or special election called for such purpose upon the
recommendation of the board or upon the receipt by the county clerk or
election commissioner of a petition requesting an election, signed by at
least five percent of the legal voters of the district. The
recommendation of the board or the petition of the legal voters shall
include the amount by which the board would increase its general fund
budget of expenditures for the ensuing school year over and above the
budget authority for the general fund budget of expenditures prescribed
in section 79-1023. The county clerk or election commissioner shall place
the question on the primary or general election ballot or call for a
special election on the issue after the receipt of such board
recommendation or legal voter petition. The election shall be held
pursuant to the Election Act or section 77-3444, and all costs for a
special election shall be paid by the district. A vote to exceed the
budget authority for the general fund budget of expenditures prescribed
in section 79-1023 may be approved on the same question as a vote to
exceed the levy limits provided in section 77-3444.
Sec. 10. Section 79-1098, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
-19-

LB135 LB135
2025 2025
amended to read:
79-1098 Whenever it is deemed necessary (1) to erect a schoolhouse
or school building or an addition or additions and improvements to any
existing schoolhouse or (2) to purchase equipment for such schoolhouse or
school buildings, in any school district in this state the school board
may and, upon petition of not less than one-fourth of the legal voters of
the school district, shall submit to the people of the school district at
an election held in compliance with subsection (3) of section 32-559 the
next general election or special election a proposition to vote a special
annual tax for that purpose of not to exceed seventeen and five-tenths
cents on each one hundred dollars upon the taxable value of all the
taxable property in such district for a term of not to exceed ten years.
Such special tax may be voted at any annual or special meeting of the
district by fifty-five percent of the legal voters attending such
meeting.
Sec. 11. Section 79-10,105, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-10,105 The school board or board of education of any public
school district may enter into a lease or lease-purchase agreement for
the exclusive use of its individual jurisdiction for such buildings or
equipment as the board determines necessary. Such lease or lease-purchase
agreements may not exceed a period of seven years, except that lease-
purchase agreements entered into as part of an energy financing contract
pursuant to section 66-1065 may not exceed a period of thirty years. All
payments pursuant to such leases shall be made from current building
funds or general funds. No school district shall directly or indirectly
issue bonds to fund any such lease-purchase plan for a capital
construction project exceeding twenty-five thousand dollars in costs
unless it first obtains approval at an election held in compliance with
subsection (3) of section 32-559 a favorable vote of the legal voters
pursuant to Chapter 10, article 7. This section does not prevent the
-20-

LB135 LB135
2025 2025
school board or board of education of any public school district from
refinancing a lease or lease-purchase agreement without a vote of the
legal voters for the purpose of lowering finance costs regardless of
whether such agreement was entered into prior to July 9, 1988.
Sec. 12. Section 79-10,117, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-10,117 The legal voters of any Class I, II, or III school
district have the power, at an election held in compliance with
subsection (3) of section 32-559 or at any annual or special meeting, to
(1) direct the purchasing or leasing of any appropriate site and the
building, leasing hiring, or purchasing of a teacherage for the purpose
of providing housing facilities for the school employees of the district,
(2) determine the amount necessary to be expended for such purposes the
succeeding year, and (3) vote on a tax on the property of the district
for the payment of the amount.
Sec. 13. Section 79-10,118, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-10,118 A tax to establish a special fund for the building,
leasing hiring, or purchasing of a teacherage for the purpose of
providing housing facilities for the school employees of any Class I, II,
or III district may be levied when authorized by fifty-five percent of
the legal voters voting on the proposition at an election held in
compliance with subsection (3) of section 32-559. The notice of the
proposal to establish such special fund shall include the sum to be
raised or the amount of the tax to be levied, the period of years, and
the time of its taking effect. If fifty-five percent of the legal voters
voting at any such election vote in favor of the proposition, the result
of such election shall be certified to the county board which, upon being
satisfied that all the requirements have been substantially complied
with, shall cause the proceedings to be entered upon the record of the
county board and shall make an order that the levy be made in accordance
-21-

LB135 LB135
2025 2025
with the election result and collected as other taxes.
Sec. 14. Original sections 10-702, 13-519, 13-2507, 79-1029,
79-1098, 79-10,105, 79-10,117, and 79-10,118, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and sections 13-809, 32-405, 32-559, 32-1203, and 77-3444,
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 15. The following section is outright repealed: Section
10-703.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska.
-22-